Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1111HV (2) 91 ll/ns H.F. 769 Section 1. Section 123.46, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. A person shall not use or consume alcoholic liquor, 3 wine, or beer upon the public streets or highways. 4 b. A person shall not use or consume alcoholic liquor in 5 any public place except premises covered by a retail alcohol 6 license. 7 c. A person shall not possess or consume alcoholic 8 liquors liquor , wine, or beer on public school property or 9 while attending a public or private school-related function. 10 However, a school board may authorize the sale, possession, and 11 consumption of alcoholic liquor, wine, or beer on public school 12 property in conjunction with a nonschool-related function 13 deemed appropriate by the school board. The authorization must 14 require that the sale, possession, and consumption of alcoholic 15 liquor, wine, or beer only occur on public school property that 16 is a licensed premises under a five-day retail alcohol license 17 issued pursuant to section 123.34 to a person other than the 18 school board. 19 d. A person shall not be intoxicated in a public place. 20 e. A person violating this subsection is guilty of a simple 21 misdemeanor. 22 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 23 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 24